Missouri, session 2026, HB2522.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 324, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 324.1173, to read as follows:
324.1173. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, for
purposes of obtaining a professional or occupational license, a person has demonstrated
lawful presence and is eligible to obtain a professional or occupational license if the
person submits:
(1) An unexpired employment authorization document issued by the United
States Department of Homeland Security, Form I-766; and
(2) Documentation issued by the United States Department of Homeland
Security, the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, or any other federal
agency, including a Form I-797 used by the United States Citizenship and Immigration
Services, demonstrating that such person is described in Section 202(c)(2)(B)(i) through
(ix) of the federal REAL ID Act of 2005, Pub. L. 109-13.
2. A professional or occupational license issued to a person eligible pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section shall be valid only for the period of time during which such
person's employment authorization document is valid.
3. Nothing in this section shall affect the requirements to obtain a professional or
occupational license that are unrelated to the lawful presence requirements
demonstrated pursuant to this section.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2522 2
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant eligibility for any public
benefits other than obtaining a professional or occupational license.
5. Any person who has complied with the requirements of this section shall have
his or her employment authorization document verified through the Systematic Alien
Verification for Entitlements Program operated by the United States Department of
Homeland Security or an equivalent program designated by the United States
Department of Homeland Security.
6. The general assembly enacts this section pursuant to the authority provided in
8 U.S.C. Section 1621(d), as such section existed on August 28, 2026.
✔